Arkansas, session 2025, HB1890.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-10-119, concerning Medicaid billing in
school districts, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as
follows:
(d)(1) A school district may bill the Arkansas Medicaid Program for
healthcare services provided to a student, including without limitation:
(A) Vision screenings;
(B) Hearing screenings; and
(C) Direct nursing services provided by a licensed
healthcare professional to a student under the supervision of a registered
nurse employed by the school district and listed in the student's
individualized health care plan according to § 6-18-701, including without
limitation to the extent allowed by federal law:
(i) Medication administration;
*JMB456*
03/21/2025 11:21:23 AM JMB456

HB1890
(ii) Blood sugar checks;
(iii) Carbohydrate counting;
(iv) Catheterization;
(v) Continuous glucose monitoring;
(vi) Insulin pump services;
(vii) Intramuscular injection;
(viii) Intravascular injection;
(ix) Subcutaneous injection;
(x) Peritoneal dialysis;
(xi) Postural drainage;
(xii) Tracheostomy care;
(xiii) Stoma care;
(xiv) Suctioning;
(xv) Tube feedings; and
(xvi) Wound care.
(2) The reimbursement from the program shall be used by the
school districts solely for school nurse services and salaries.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 77, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-77-154. School district reimbursement.
(a) The Arkansas Medicaid Program shall reimburse a school district
for any of the following healthcare services provided by a licensed
healthcare professional in a school setting to a student who is a
beneficiary:
(1) Vision screenings;
(2) Hearing screenings; and
(3) Direct nursing services provided by a licensed healthcare
professional to a student under the supervision of a registered nurse
employed by the school district and listed in the student's individualized
health care plan according to § 6-18-701, including without limitation to the
extent allowed by federal law:
(A) Medication administration;
(B) Blood sugar checks;
(C) Carbohydrate counting;
(D) Catheterization;
03/21/2025 11:21:23 AM JMB456

HB1890
(E) Continuous glucose monitoring;
(F) Insulin pump services;
(G) Intramuscular injection;
(H) Intravascular injection;
(I) Subcutaneous injection;
(J) Peritoneal dialysis;
(K) Postural drainage;
(L) Tracheostomy care;
(M) Stoma care;
(N) Suctioning;
(O) Tube feedings; and
(P) Wound care.
(b) The reimbursement under this section shall be provided to the
school districts solely for school nurse services and salaries as required
under § 6-10-119.





















03/21/2025 11:21:23 AM JMB456